Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-411 Separability. If any
provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is for any reason held to be invalid, the remainder of the article
and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall
not be affected thereby. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next